Mississippi statutes. Title 95. Torts
Chapter 5. Trespass

§§ 95-5-1 through 95-5-9.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1989, ch. 558, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§95-5-1. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 12, art. 6(9); 1857, ch. 18, art. 2; 1871, § 2474; 1880, § 962; 1892, § 4411; 1906, § 4976; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3245; 1930, § 3410; 1942, § 1074; Laws, 1950, ch. 312, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 395, § 1]

§95-5-3. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 12, art. 6(7); 1857, ch. 18, art. 1; 1871, § 2473; 1880, § 961; 1892, § 4412; 1906, § 4977; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3246; 1930, § 3411; 1942, § 1075; Laws, 1924, ch. 167; Laws, 1950, ch. 312, § 2; Laws, 1981, ch. 395, § 2]

§95-5-5. [Codes, 1857, ch. 18, art. 3; 1871, § 2475; 1880, § 963; 1892, § 4413; 1906, § 4978; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3247; 1930, § 3412; 1942, § 1076]

§95-5-7. [Codes, 1857, ch. 18, art. 4; 1871, § 2476; 1880, § 964; 1892, § 4414; 1906, § 4979; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3248; 1930, § 3413; 1942, § 1077]

§95-5-9. [Codes, 1857, ch. 18, art. 5; 1871, § 2477; 1880, § 965; 1892, § 4415; 1906, § 4980; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3249; 1930, § 3414; 1942, § 1078]

§ 95-5-10.
Cutting trees without consent of owner.

If any person shall cut down, deaden, destroy or take away any tree without the consent of the owner of such tree, such person shall pay to the owner of such tree a sum equal to double the fair market value of the tree cut down, deadened, destroyed or taken away, together with the reasonable cost of reforestation, which cost shall not exceed Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) per acre. The liability for the damages established in this subsection shall be absolute and unconditional and the fact that a person cut down, deadened, destroyed or took away any tree in good faith or by honest mistake shall not be an exception or defense to liability. To establish a right of the owner prima facie to recover under the provisions of this subsection, the owner shall only be required to show that such timber belonged to such owner, and that such timber was cut down, deadened, destroyed or taken away by the defendant, his agents or employees, without the consent of such owner. The remedy provided for in this section shall be the exclusive remedy for the cutting down, deadening, destroying or taking away of trees and shall be in lieu of any other compensatory, punitive or exemplary damages for the cutting down, deadening, destroying or taking away of trees but shall not limit actions or awards for other damages caused by a person.

If the cutting down, deadening, destruction or taking away of a tree without the consent of the owner of such tree be done willfully, or in reckless disregard for the rights of the owner of such tree, then in addition to the damages provided for in subsection (1) of this section, the person cutting down, deadening, destroying or taking away such tree shall pay to the owner as a penalty Fifty-five Dollars ($55.00) for every tree so cut down, deadened, destroyed or taken away if such tree is seven (7) inches or more in diameter at a height of eighteen (18) inches above ground level, or Ten Dollars ($10.00) for every such tree so cut down, deadened, destroyed or taken away if such tree is less than seven (7) inches in diameter at a height of eighteen (18) inches above ground level, as established by a preponderance of the evidence. To establish the right of the owner prima facie, to recover under the provisions of this subsection, it shall be required of the owner to show that the defendant or his agents or employees, acting under the command or consent of their principal, willfully and knowingly, in conscious disregard for the rights of the owner, cut down, deadened, destroyed or took away such trees.

All reasonable expert witness fees and attorney’s fees shall be assessed as court costs in the discretion of the court.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 558, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1989, and applicable to causes of action accruing on or after July 1, 1989.

§ 95-5-11.
Loosening or taking boats and water craft.

Every person who, without the consent of the owner or person in charge, shall loosen or take away any boat or water craft, shall pay to the owner thereof Twenty Dollars ($20.00), over and above the expenses for bringing back such boat or water craft.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 12, art. 6(6); 1857, ch. 18, art. 6; 1871, § 2478; 1880, § 966; 1892, § 4416; 1906, § 4981; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3250; 1930, § 3415; 1942, § 1079.

§ 95-5-13.
Taking cottonseed sacks.

If a corporation or the agent or employee of a corporation shall deliver or cause to be delivered to any other corporation or its agent or employee for transportation, or shall receive for such purpose, or shall remove or secrete, without the consent of the owner or of his agent, any bag or sack commonly known as a cottonseed sack, so marked as to indicate its owner, it or he shall pay to the owner Twenty-five Cents (25¢) for each bag or sack so delivered or caused to be delivered, or received, or removed or secreted.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4417; 1906, § 4982; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3251; 1930, § 3416; 1942, § 1080.

§ 95-5-15.
Boxing pine trees.

If any person shall box for turpentine, or shall cut or cause to be cut a box or boxes in a pine tree on land not his own, without consent of the owner of the land or tree, he shall pay to the owner thereof Five Dollars ($5.00) for each pine tree so boxed or cut.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4418; 1906, § 4983; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3252; 1930, § 3417; 1942, § 1081.

§ 95-5-17.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1983, ch. 374, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

[Codes, 1880, §§ 815-817; 1892, § 4419; 1906, § 4984; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3253; 1930, § 3418; 1942, § 1082]

§ 95-5-19.
Poultry or livestock-killing dog; how dealt with.

The owner, or the immediate family, employee or agent of the owner, of any poultry or livestock, including cattle, horses, mules, jacks, jennets, sheep, goats and hogs, may kill any dog in the act of chasing or killing any such poultry or livestock, and any such person shall not be liable therefor to the owner of the dog.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, §§ 815-817; 1892, § 4420; 1906, § 4985; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3254; 1930, § 3419; 1942, § 1083; Laws, 1983, ch. 374, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 377, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 95-5-21.
Poultry and livestock killed by dog; owner liable.

If any dog shall kill or injure any poultry or any livestock, including cattle, horses, mules, jacks, jennets, sheep, goats and hogs, the owner of the dog shall pay to the owner of such poultry or livestock any loss suffered as a result of such injury and the value of the poultry or livestock killed and all costs of collection, including court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1083.5; Laws, 1956, ch. 242; Laws, 1983, ch. 374, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 95-5-23.
To fences, bars, gates, bridges, buildings.

If any person shall put down any fence or bars, or open any gate, not his own, and leave the same down or open, without the permission of the owner, or shall in any manner injure or deface any bridge, building, or other structure not his own, he shall pay to the owner Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for every such offense, and shall be liable for all damages that may have resulted from such act.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1847, ch. 12, art. 6(8); 1857, ch. 16, art. 19; 1871, § 1925; 1880, § 989; 1892, § 4422; 1906, § 4987; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3256; 1930, § 3421; 1942, § 1085.

§ 95-5-25.
By firing woods.

If any person shall set on fire any lands of another, or shall wantonly, negligently, or carelessly allow any fire to get into the lands of another, he shall be liable to the person injured thereby, not only for the injury to or destruction of buildings, fences, and the like, but for the burning and injury of trees, timber, and grass, and damage to the range as well; and shall moreover be liable to a penalty of One Hundred and Fifty Dollars ($150.00) in favor of the owner.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 13, art. 5(2); 1857, ch. 28, art. 1; 1871, § 2741; 1880, § 2816; 1892, § 4423; 1906, § 4988; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3257; 1930, § 3422; 1942, § 1086.

§ 95-5-27.
On lands held by the state.

All the provisions of this chapter giving a penalty for cutting down, deadening, girdling, boxing, destroying, or taking away trees of any kind, herein mentioned, and regulating the remedy for enforcing the same, shall apply when the injury is committed on land belonging to the state, or which is held by the state in trust for any purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4421; 1906, § 4986; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3255; 1930, § 3420; 1942, § 1084.

§ 95-5-29.
Limitation of actions; effect of recovery; claiming less than statutory penalty.

An action for the remedies and penalties provided by Section 95-5-10 may be prosecuted in any court of competent jurisdiction within twenty-four (24) months from the time the injury was committed and not after. All other actions for any specific penalty given by this chapter may be prosecuted in any court of competent jurisdiction within twelve (12) months from the time the injury was committed, and not after; and a recovery of any penalty herein given shall not be a bar to any action for further damages, or to any criminal prosecution for any such offense as herein enumerated. A party, if he so elect, may, under any of the provisions of this chapter, claim less than the penalty given.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 57, art. 6(4); 1857, ch. 18, art. 7; 1871, § 2479; 1880, § 968; 1892, § 4424; 1906, § 4989; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3258; 1930, § 3423; 1942, § 1087; Laws, 1999, ch. 431, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 19, 1999).

§ 95-5-31.
Duty of possessor of real property to trespasser.

For the purposes of this section, the following words shall have the following meanings:

“Possessor of real property” means any person with a fee, reversionary, or easement interest in real property, including an owner, lessee, or other lawful occupant.

“Trespasser” means a person who enters upon the property of another without permission and without an invitation, express or implied, or other legal right.

A possessor of real property owes no duty of care to a trespasser, except a duty to refrain from willfully or wantonly injuring such a person.

Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, a possessor of real property may be subject to liability for injury to a trespasser if:

The possessor discovers the trespasser in a position of peril on the property and fails to exercise reasonable care to prevent injury to that trespasser; or

The trespasser is a child injured by an artificial condition on the possessor’s property and all of the following apply:

The place where the condition existed was one upon which the possessor knew or had reason to know that a child would be likely to trespass;

The condition is one of which the possessor knew or had reason to know and which the possessor realized or should have realized would involve an unreasonable risk of death or serious bodily harm to a child;

The injured child because of his or her youth did not discover the condition or realize the risk involved in intermeddling with it or in coming within the area made dangerous by it;

The utility to the possessor of maintaining the condition and the burden of eliminating the danger was slight as compared with the risk to the child; and

The possessor failed to exercise reasonable care to eliminate the danger or otherwise to protect the child.

This section does not create or increase the liability of any possessor of real property and does not affect any immunities from or defenses to civil liability established by another section of the Mississippi Code of 1972 or available at common law to which a possessor of real property may be entitled.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 407, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.